Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 8. Joint Water Management Districts

§ 51-8-1.
Creation of joint water management district; petition to existing district.

Any two (2) or more local governmental units, being defined herein to mean a county or municipality, may create a joint water management district in the manner set forth in this chapter.

If any local governmental unit is located within an existing water management district, then the local governmental unit shall petition the district to provide a service or function needed by the petitioning unit, provided the service or function is one which the district has the power and authority to perform. Upon receipt of the petition, the existing district shall have ninety (90) days within which to respond affirmatively to the petition, setting forth its intent to meet the need or perform the service or function and its proposal or plan for meeting the need or performing the service or function. If the existing water district does not affirmatively respond in a timely fashion, then any two (2) or more local governmental units may create a joint water management district in the manner set forth in this chapter.

The joint water management district may include any geographic area within the boundaries of the interested governmental units.

A joint water management district may be created although adequate water supply, flood control, drainage or other water or wastewater management activities are being undertaken by one or more of the local governmental units interested in creating a joint water management district or by another corporate agency existing and operating within the geographical area of the joint water management district. The term “corporate agency,” as used herein, means any agency or subdivision of the state or federal government, any body politic and corporate created under the laws of this state, any utility, or any public or private profit or nonprofit corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1985; Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 51-8-3.
Purpose of district.

A joint water management district may be created for the purpose of establishing a water supply system, conserving water resources, developing additional water resources or any other water or wastewater management function not being performed by an existing water management district, except that such a district as described in Section 51-8-1 may not be created for the purpose of constructing, contracting for the construction of, or serving as a local sponsor for the construction of, any dam or other flood control facility or project, the primary purpose of which is to control flooding on any part of the Pearl River, Mississippi River, Yazoo River, Tombigbee River, Big Black River, Pearl River, Pascagoula River, Tallahatchie River, Yalobusha River, Homochito River, Buffalo River, Leaf River, Coldwater River, Sunflower River, Little Sunflower River, Wolf River, Yockanookany River, Ofahoma River, Strong River, Bogue Chitto River, Amite River, Bayou Pierre River, Tangipahoa River, Noxubee River, Buttahatchee River, Chunky River, Biloxi River, Tippah River, Hatchie River, Jourdan River, Bowie River, Chickasawhay River and Escatawpa River.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-5.
Local government resolutions; contents.

Creation of a joint water management district shall be initiated by identical resolutions passed by each interested local governmental unit. Such resolution shall set forth in detail the geographic boundaries of the district, the function or functions to be performed by the district, a statement of the necessity for the creation of the district, the proposed corporate name of the district and any other information reasonably necessary to inform the constituency of the governmental unit of the purpose and obligations of the respective units proposing to form the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-7.
Public hearings.

Each governmental unit proposing to form a joint water management district shall hold a public hearing in the same manner as set out in Section 19-5-155.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-9.
Findings required.

After the public hearing required by Section 51-8-7 and upon full consideration of all matters and facts presented at such hearing, each such local governmental unit shall make a finding that the public convenience and necessity requires the creation of the district and that the creation of the district is economically sound and feasible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-11.
Publication of findings; petition for election.

Upon the making of such finding, the governing body of each interested local governmental unit shall publish the finding accompanied by the initial resolution specified in Section 51-8-5 in the manner provided in Section 19-5-157.

If twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is lesser, of the qualified electors of a local governmental unit file a written petition with the governing body of such unit on or before the date specified for creation of the district, an election shall be held in the same manner prescribed by Section 19-5-157.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-13.
Adoption of resolution creating district.

If no petition requiring an election be filed or if three-fifths (3/5) of those voting in said election vote in favor of the creation of such district, the governing body of such local governmental unit shall adopt a resolution creating the district as described in the initial resolution specified in Section 51-8-5.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-15.
Payment of costs.

All costs incident to the publication of the notices and all other costs incident to the public hearing and election provided in Sections 51-8-7 and 51-8-11 may be paid by the applicable governing body.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-17.
Appeals from local government findings.

Any party having an interest in the subject matter and aggrieved or prejudiced by the findings and adjudication of the applicable governing body may appeal to the circuit court of the county in the manner provided by law for appeals from orders of such bodies. However, if no such appeal be taken within a period of thirty (30) days from and after the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any such district, the creation of such district shall be final and conclusive and shall not thereafter be subject to attack in any court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-19.
District to be public corporation in perpetuity.

From and after the date of adoption of the resolution creating a joint water management district, such district shall be a public corporation in perpetuity in its corporate name and shall, in that name, be a body politic and corporate with power of perpetual succession.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-21.
Board of commissioners; membership; authority; withdrawal of district member.

The powers of each such district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of a minimum of five (5) members, to be selected in the manner provided in the initial resolution prescribed by Section 51-8-5. Provided, however, there shall be at least one (1) member from each county within the district.

The resolution may provide that commissioners will be elected by the electors of the local governmental unit or units which they represent or that commissioners will be appointed by the governing body or bodies of the local governmental units which are members of the district. The resolution shall also prescribe the term of office, which shall not exceed five (5) years, and shall establish the length of initial terms, if staggered terms are to be used. Vacancies and unexpired terms shall be filled by the governing body of each local governmental unit.

Notwithstanding the appointive authority herein granted to the said governing body, its legal and actual responsibilities, authority and function, subsequent to the creation of any such district, shall be specifically limited to said appointive function and the responsibilities outlined in Sections 51-8-1, 51-8-5, 51-8-7, 51-8-9, 51-8-11, 51-8-13, 51-8-15, 51-8-31, 51-8-33, 51-8-35, 51-8-43, 51-8-45, and 51-8-57. The operation, management, abolition or dissolution of such district, and all other matters in connection therewith, shall be vested solely and only in said board of commissioners to the specific exclusion of said governing body, and the abolition, dissolution or termination of any such district shall be accomplished only by unanimous resolution of the board of commissioners. However, such board of commissioners shall have no power, jurisdiction or authority to abolish, dissolve or terminate any such district while such district has any outstanding indebtedness of any kind or character.

After a district is created, a local governmental unit may withdraw as a member thereof only if:

The district has no outstanding indebtedness of any kind or character;

Withdrawal would not impair the district’s water management plan or objectives;

The withdrawing entity is not receiving benefits from the water management operations and activities of the district; and

Withdrawal is approved by a three-fifths (3/5) vote of the board of commissioners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-23.
Officers of board; duties; terms; official seal.

The board of commissioners shall organize by electing one (1) of its members as chairman and another as vice chairman. It shall be the duty of the chairman to preside at all meetings of the board and to act as the chief executive officer of the board and of the district. The vice chairman shall act in the absence or disability of the chairman. Such board also shall elect and fix the compensation of secretary-treasurer who may or may not be a member of the board. It shall be the duty of the secretary-treasurer to keep all minutes and records of the board and to safely keep all funds of the district. The secretary-treasurer shall be required to execute a bond, payable to the district, in a sum and with such security as shall be fixed and approved by the board of commissioners. The terms of all officers of the board shall be for one (1) year from and after the date of election, and shall run until their respective successors are appointed and qualified.

Each board of commissioners shall adopt an official seal with which to attest the official acts and records of the board and district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-25.
Commissioners; qualifications; oath; compensation; meetings.

Every resident citizen of a local governmental unit in any district created pursuant to this chapter, of good reputation, being the owner of land or the conductor of a business situated within such district and being over twenty-one (21) years of age and of sound mind and judgment, shall be eligible to hold the office of commissioner.

Each person appointed as a commissioner, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, shall be required to execute a bond payable to the State of Mississippi in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) conditioned that he will faithfully discharge the duties of his office; each such bond shall be approved by the clerk of the governing body of such unit and filed with said clerk.

Any commissioner who shall remove his residence from the local governmental unit from which he was appointed or elected shall be deemed to have automatically vacated his office.

Each commissioner shall take and subscribe to an oath of office prescribed in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, before the clerk of said governing body that he will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of commissioner, which oath shall also be filed with said clerk and by him preserved with such official bond.

The commissioners so appointed and qualified shall be compensated on a per diem basis for their services for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, at the rates established by law for state boards and commissions. Commissioners shall also be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in such amounts as are allowed for members of state boards and commissions.

The board of commissioners shall hold regular monthly meetings and such other special meetings as may be called by the chairman or a majority of the commissioners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-27.
Rules and regulations of board.

The board of commissioners shall have the power to adopt, promulgate, modify and repeal, and to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce, rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the creation of the district, provided that such regulations shall conform to and not conflict with regulations promulgated by state regulatory agencies responsible for regulating the activities which the district was created to perform.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-29.
Powers of district, generally.

Districts created under this chapter shall have the powers set out in the creating resolution not inconsistent with the powers set forth in this chapter, and in addition, the power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, consolidate, maintain and operate facilities and to contract with any municipality, person, firm or corporation for services and for a supply and distribution of water, for collection, transportation, treatment and/or disposal of sewage and for services required incident to the operation and maintenance of such systems. Except as provided elsewhere in this chapter, as long as any such district continues to furnish any of the services which it was authorized to furnish in and by the resolution by which it was created, it shall be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish such services within such district.

Any district created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be vested with all the powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purpose for which such district is created. No enumeration of powers herein shall be construed to impair or limit any general grant of power herein contained nor to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those enumerated. Such districts are empowered to do all acts necessary, proper or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted under such sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-31.
Enumerated powers.

Any district created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, acting by and through the board of commissioners of such district as its governing authority, shall have, among others, the following powers:

To sue and be sued;

To acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease or any other mode of acquisition, and to hold or dispose of, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district;

To make and enter into contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds, leases or contracts for financial advisory services;

To incur debts, to borrow money, to issue negotiable bonds, and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

To fix, maintain, collect and revise rates and charges for services rendered by or through the facilities of such district, which rates and charges shall not be subject to review or regulation by the Mississippi Public Service Commission except in those instances where a city operating similar services would be subject to regulation and review; however, said district shall obtain a certificate of convenience and necessity from the Mississippi Public Service Commission for operating water and/or sewer systems;

To pledge all or any part of its revenues to the payment of its obligations;

To make such covenants in connection with the issuance of bonds or to secure the payment of bonds that a private business corporation can make under the general laws of the state;

To use any right-of-way, public right-of-way, easement, or other similar property or property rights necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of the facilities of such district held by the state or any political subdivision thereof; however, the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use;

To enter into agreements with state and federal agencies for loans, grants, grants-in-aid, and other forms of assistance, including, but not limited to, participation in the sale and purchase of bonds;

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, any existing works and facilities providing services for which it was created, and any lands, rights, easements, franchises and other property, real and personal, necessary to the completion and operation of such system upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon, and, if necessary as part of the acquisition price, to assume the payment of outstanding notes, bonds or other obligations upon such system; however, if any corporate agency owning such facilities desires to continue providing such services, the corporate agency shall so notify the district not later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the creation of the district, and the district shall thereupon relinquish its right to provide such services until and unless the corporate agency elects otherwise or fails to adequately provide such services;

To extend its services to areas beyond but within one (1) mile of the boundaries of such district; however, no such extension shall be made to areas already occupied by another corporate agency rendering the same service so long as such corporate agency desires to continue to serve such areas. Areas outside of the district desiring to be served which are beyond the one-mile limit must be brought into the district by annexation proceedings;

To be deemed to have the same status as counties and municipalities with respect to payment of sales taxes on purchases made by such districts;

To borrow funds for interim financing subject to receipt of funds as outlined in Section 51-8-35;

To choose a location within the district as the central office of the district;

To adopt a plan for management of the water resources of the district, provided that such plan first be submitted to and approved by the Commission on Natural Resources as consistent with the state water management plan or objectives;

To hire such personnel and contract for such legal, technical, or other services as the board of commissioners deems necessary for the operation of the district and fulfillment of its water management objectives; and

To secure connection to or participation in the services provided by the district, including the power to obtain mandatory or prohibitory injunctive relief; provided, however, that the authority of the board of commissioners shall not be exercised in conflict with the regulatory and enforcement authority of the Commission on Natural Resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-33.
Powers of eminent domain.

The board of commissioners may exercise, on behalf of the district, such powers of eminent domain as are specified in the creating resolution wherever and whenever public necessity and convenience so requires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-35.
Issuance of bonds.

Any such district shall have the power to provide funds for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending the facilities of such district or for the purpose of buying, leasing or otherwise acquiring the assets and facilities of any nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under Title 79, Chapter 11, or any other utility district by the issuance of revenue bonds. Such bonds shall be payable solely and only from the revenues of such facilities, and such revenues may be pledged from a portion of the service area of the district to the support of debt service for a specific series or issue of bonds if such apportionment is economically feasible.

Any such district shall have the power to provide funds, in addition to or in conjunction with the funds authorized in subsection (1) of this section, for water supply or pollution abatement projects by issuing special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or combinations of special improvement water and sewer bonds, if the resolution creating the district authorized the governing bodies of the local governmental bodies to make assessments against benefitted properties as outlined in Section 51-8-45. Such bonds shall be payable solely and only from charges assessed to benefitted properties as outlined in said Section 51-8-45.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-37.
Procedures for issuance of bonds; form, content, and terms of bonds.

The board of commissioners of any district created pursuant to this chapter may issue revenue or special improvement bonds of such district by resolution spread upon the minutes of such board. Bonds may be issued from time to time without an election being held upon the question of their issuance unless the board of commissioners of the district is presented with a petition for an election upon the question of issuance signed by twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is lesser, of the qualified electors residing within the district. The resolution authorizing any issue of bonds other than the initial issue shall be published in a manner similar to the publication of the resolution, as outlined in Section 51-8-11. If an election is required, it shall be held in substantial accord with the election outlined in Section 51-8-11. The cost of this election shall be borne by the district.

All bonds shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting. They shall be in denominations of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and may be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued, the total amount authorized to be issued, the interest on the bond, and that such bonds shall never constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the district or local governmental unit or a charge against the general credit or taxing powers of the local governmental unit.

Such bonds shall contain such covenants and provisions; shall be executed; shall be in such form, format, type, denomination or denominations; shall be payable as to principal and interest, at such place or places; and shall mature at such time or times, all as shall be determined by such board of commissioners and set forth in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds shall be issued. The date of maturity of such bonds shall not exceed forty (40) years from the date of the bonds, except that on special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or special improvement water and sewer bonds, the date of maturity shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years from their date.

No bonds shall bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103; no bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified on the bonds; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, or annually, except that the first interest payment may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. No interest payment on bearer bonds shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than sixty percent (60%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.

Such bonds shall be signed by the chairman and secretary-treasurer of the commission with the seal of the commission affixed thereto; however, the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such chairman and secretary-treasurer.

Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority of this chapter shall be securities within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, being Section 75-8-101 et seq.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-39.
Sale of bonds; interest rates; refunds; validation.

The bonds issued under this chapter shall be sold for not less than par value plus accrued interest at public sale in the manner provided for in Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972; however, bonds may be sold to the United States of America or an agency or instrumentality thereof at private sale.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of either one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) or one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

Any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be refunded in like manner as revenue bonds of municipalities shall be refunded.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be submitted to validation under the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-41.
Creation and enforcement of lien; appointment of receiver.

There is hereby created a statutory lien in the nature of a mortgage lien upon any system or systems acquired or constructed in accordance with this chapter, including all extensions and improvements thereof or combinations thereof subsequently made, which lien shall be in favor of the holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to said sections, and all such property shall remain subject to such statutory lien until the payment in full of the principal of and interest on said bonds. Any holder of said bonds or any of the coupons representing interest thereon may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, in any court of competent jurisdiction, protect and enforce such statutory lien and compel the performance of all duties required by said sections, including the making and collection of sufficient rates for the service or services, the proper accounting thereof, and the performance of any duties required by covenants with the holders of any bonds issued in accordance herewith.

If any default is made in the payment of the principal of or interest on such bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer said district and said system or systems, with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds and obligations outstanding against said system or systems, and for payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues thereof in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and any covenants with bondholders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-43.
Special tax levy; district authorized to expend tax funds on projects related to Mississippi Delta Study.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the governing body of any local governmental unit which is a member of any such district may, according to the terms of the resolution, levy a special tax, not to exceed two (2) mills, on all of the taxable property in such district, the avails of which shall be paid over to the board of commissioners of the district to be used for preparation and implementation of the district’s water management plan, exclusive of capital expenditures, and operation of the administrative office of the district. Provided, however, that such special tax shall not be levied against any property in any portion of such district where the district has relinquished and surrendered its prior right to provide a particular service, as provided elsewhere in this chapter.

The Board of Commissioners of the Yazoo-Mississippi Joint Water Management District is authorized to expend funds generated from the special tax levy under subsection (1) in connection with projects under the USDA, NRCS Mississippi Delta Comprehensive, Multipurpose Water Resource Plan hereinafter referred to as the “Mississippi Delta Study.” Such projects include low flows, interbasin transfers of new water supplies, on-farm storage reservoirs or conservation, and implementation activities such as the Sunflower River Low Flow Project and Well Field Project in Coahoma County, Mississippi. Expenditures under this subsection may include in-kind expenditures as well as direct expenditures, the cost and expenses of construction, operation and maintenance of the projects, and the cost and expenses of an indirect nature, such as technological assistance, engineering and scientific evaluation and analysis by technical personnel, labor, transportation and any expenditure that is intended to satisfy the districts’ in-kind obligations in connection with the projects. However, the expenditures authorized by this subsection shall not extend to any project that relates to, encompasses or includes effluent treatment facilities or any water supply system to which the Safe Drinking Water Act applies, and any other projects that are determined by the district to be beyond the scope of the Mississippi Delta Study Projects.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 22; Laws, 2005, ch. 363, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2005.).

§ 51-8-45.
Funds for debt service for special improvement bonds.

Funds for debt service for special improvement pollution abatement bonds, special improvement water bonds, or special improvement water and sewer bonds issued in lieu of or in conjunction with revenue bonds shall be provided by charges upon the properties benefitted according to procedures set forth in this section.

So long as any special improvement bond authorized by this chapter shall remain outstanding, it shall be the duty of the governing bodies at the time its annual tax levies are made, to levy such assessments as are certified to them by the district as being due and payable at a stated time. It shall be the duty of the tax collector of each such governing body to collect such charges and pay the funds collected to the board of commissioners of the district for payment to interest and principal and to the retirement of bonds issued by the district in accord with the maturities schedule pertaining thereto.

One (1) of the following procedures may be utilized in providing funds as authorized by this section:

Funds for debt service may be provided by charges assessed against the property abutting upon the sewer, or abutting upon the railroad and/or utility right-of-way, street, road, highway, easement or alley in which such sewer mains or water mains are installed according to the frontage thereof.

The board of commissioners of the district, after giving notice and hearing protests in the manner prescribed by Sections 21-41-5 and 21-41-7, shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, define the services to be offered and the entire area to be benefitted by each improvement; each such improvement may be designated as a project, or all such improvements may be designated as one (1) project. However, if forty percent (40%) of the property owners or the owners of more than forty percent (40%) of the front footage of the property involved and actually residing on property owned by them and included within that part of any street, avenue, etc., ordered to be specially improved, or otherwise actually occupying property owned by them and included within that area designated as a project, shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made and the assessment shall not be made.

The resolution shall direct that the cost to be assessed against each lot or parcel of land shall be determined by dividing the entire assessable cost of the project by the total number of front feet fronting on the street, easement or other right-of-way in which all of the mains embraced within the project are installed and multiplying the quotient by the total number of front feet in any particular lot or parcel of land fronting on the street, easement or other right-of-way in which sewer mains or water mains are installed. The result thereof shall be delivered by the board of commissioners of the district to the applicable governing body as the amount of special tax to be assessed against each lot or piece of ground for the owner’s part of the total cost of the improvements.

The resolution, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, may provide for the district to pay the assessment against any property abutting a sewer or water improvement, if the property whose assessment is being paid by the district is occupied by a contributor or consumer connected to the sewer or water system who is, or will be, paying service charges at the time the assessment roll maintained by the district is confirmed; provided, however, such payment shall not exceed an amount equal to that assessed against any one hundred twenty-five (125) feet of frontage of abutting property in a project.

The resolution may, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, provide for the district to pay the assessment against any property abutting a section of sewer main or water main designated as necessary and essential to the overall operation of such system or systems; provided, however, no service shall be provided to any such abutting property until and unless all such payments made by the district are repaid to the district by the owners of such benefitted property.

Funds for debt service may be provided by charges assessed against a lot or block in a recorded subdivision of land or by other appropriately designated parcel or tract of land in accord with the following procedure:

The board of commissioners of the district, after giving notice and hearing protests in the manner prescribed by Sections 21-41-5 and 21-41-7, shall by resolution spread upon its minutes define the services to be offered and the entire area to be benefitted by each improvement; each such improvement may be designated as a project, or all such improvements may be designated as one (1) project. However, if forty percent (40%) of the property owners or the owners of more than forty percent (40%) of the front footage of the property involved and actually residing on property owned by them and included within that part of any street, avenue, etc., ordered to be specifically improved, or otherwise actually occupying property owned by them and included within that area designated as a project, shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made and the assessment shall not be made.

Charges shall be assessed in accord with the provisions of Sections 21-41-9 through 21-41-21 and 21-41-25 through 21-41-39.

The resolution providing for assessments under the provisions of this subsection, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, may provide for the district to pay the assessment against any lot or parcel of ground not exceeding one (1) acre in size, if such property is occupied by a contributor or consumer connected to the sewer or water system who is, or will be, paying service charges at the time the assessment roll maintained by the district is confirmed.

The resolution providing for assessment of benefitted properties under this procedure shall provide for appropriate payment to debt service accounts by property owners not included in the original assessment roll but benefitted by facilities installed with funds provided by such assessments at, or prior to, the time at which a nonassessed but benefitted property is actually served by said facilities.

Funds for debt service may be provided by charges assessed against lands of the district in proportion to the benefits accruing to said lands in accord with the following procedure:

The board of commissioners of the district, after giving notice and hearing protests in the manner prescribed by Sections 21-41-5 and 21-41-7, shall by resolution spread upon its minutes define the services to be offered and the entire area to be benefitted by each improvement; each such improvement may be designated as a project, or all such improvements may be designated as one (1) project. However, if forty percent (40%) of the property owners or the owners of more than forty percent (40%) of the property included within that area designated as a project, shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made and the assessment shall not be made.

Charges shall be assessed in applicable manner following the provisions of Sections 21-41-9 through 21-41-21 and 21-41-25 through 21-41-39.

The resolution providing for assessments under the provisions of this subsection, at the discretion of the governing authorities of the district, may provide for the district to pay the assessment against any lot or parcel of ground not exceeding one (1) acre in size, if such property is occupied by a contributor or consumer connected to the sewer or water system who is, or will be, paying service charges at the time the assessment roll maintained by the district is confirmed.

The resolution providing for assessment of benefitted properties under this procedure shall provide for appropriate payment to debt service accounts by property owners not included in the original assessment roll but benefitted by facilities installed with funds provided by such assessments at, or prior to, the time at which a nonassessed but benefitted property is actually served by said facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1985.